Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 5

Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry

45-13-501. Authority to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner is authorized to require mortgage lenders, mortgage loan brokers and mortgage loan servicers, and shall require all mortgage loan originators, to be licensed or registered, or both, through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this subsection (a), the commissioner is authorized to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the commissioner may:

Promulgate whatever rules and regulations necessary for participation in, transition to or operation of the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

Establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter;

Require that applications for licensing under this chapter, as well as renewals of such licenses, be filed with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

Require that any fees required to be paid under this chapter be paid through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry; and

Establish for licensees deadlines for transitioning to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, which authority includes the refusal to accept any applications or renewal applications not filed with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry after the deadlines, notwithstanding any dates established elsewhere in this chapter; provided, however, that the commissioner shall provide reasonable notice of the deadlines pertaining to transitioning.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner retains full authority and discretion to license persons under this chapter and to enforce this chapter to its fullest extent. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to be a reduction or derogation of that authority and discretion.

Applicants for and holders of licenses issued under this chapter shall pay all costs associated with submitting an application to or transitioning a license to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, as well as all costs required by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for maintaining and renewing any license issued by the commissioner on the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-502. Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as agent.

The commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as an agent for channeling information, whether criminal or noncriminal in nature, whether derived from or distributed to the United States department of justice or any other state or federal governmental agency, or any other source, that the commissioner is authorized to request or distribute under this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-503. Mortgage call reports.

Each person holding a license issued under this chapter shall, pursuant to an order or direction of the commissioner, submit to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, which shall be in the form and shall contain the information that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry requires.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-504. Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information challenge process.

The commissioner shall establish a process whereby mortgage loan originators may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry by the commissioner.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-505. Confidentiality.

In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

Except as otherwise provided in P.L. 110-289, § 1512 (12 U.S.C. § 5111), the requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law, including under § 45-1-120;

For the purposes of subdivision (1), the commissioner is authorized to enter agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators or other associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule, regulation or order of the commissioner;

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subdivision (1) shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives that privilege, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person;

This section shall supersede any inconsistent provisions of title 10, chapter 7, part 5 pertaining to the records open to public inspection.

This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by the public.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

45-13-506. Report to Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The commissioner shall regularly report violations of this chapter by mortgage loan originators, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information pertaining thereto, to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, subject to §45-13-505.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.